Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-426
Citation; failure to appear; penalty.

Any person failing to appear or otherwise comply with the command of a citation shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than three months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

Laws 1974, LB 829, § 5.

Traffic infraction, refusal to sign citation, see section 60-684.

One-year probation as sentence for violating this section affirmed. State v. Meints, 223 Neb. 199, 388 N.W.2d 813 (1986).